Vermont, session 2025-2026, H610.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. ENERGY NAVIGATOR PROGRAM; REPORT
(a) In collaboration with existing community-based energy navigator
programs in Vermont, such as the Climate Economy Action Center of Addison
County, Efficiency Vermont shall design a Vermont community-based home
energy navigator and coaching program that will provide in-person and remote
energy coaching services to residential consumers in communities statewide.
Efficiency Vermont shall consult with the Vermont State Energy Office, the
Vermont Climate Action Office, Vermont’s community action agencies, the
Vermont Energy and Climate Action Network, Vermont’s electric utilities, and
VT LEG #386174 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.610
2026 Page 2 of 4
other states, including Connecticut and Massachusetts, that have experience
with community-based energy programs. For the purposes of this section,
“residential consumers” includes homeowners, landlords, and renters.
(b) The program shall:
(1) provide guidance to residential consumers, particularly those with
low and moderate incomes, to better understand and navigate energy efficiency
and clean energy investment options to affordably meet their home energy
needs;
(2) advise residential consumers on accessing available grants, rebates,
financing, and other assistance programs and incentives to meet their home
energy needs;
(3) assist residential consumers in prioritizing identified energy-saving
opportunities, including through the integration of weatherization strategies to
reduce heating and cooling loads that could minimize the need for the
installation of new equipment and lower future electric demands on the grid;
(4) help residential consumers connect to local contractors and review
and analyze contractor recommendations regarding cost, payment, and other
relevant factors;
(5) advise residential consumers in person, as necessary, and over time,
recognizing that hands-on coaching help may be needed at a consumer’s home
and over several years;
VT LEG #386174 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.610
2026 Page 3 of 4
(6) provide ongoing State funding to support the operations of
community-based energy coaching programs; and
(7) use available grant funds and private partnerships to support
program implementation.
(c) On or before January 15, 2027, Efficiency Vermont shall submit a
report on the program design to the House Committee on Energy and Digital
Infrastructure and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy.
The report shall include a description of the design of the program, which
could include the creation of a pilot program or expansion and support of
existing community-based programs, a description of the technical assistance
and educational materials to be developed as part of the program, an estimate
of program costs, funding sources to provide ongoing support to community-
based energy coaching programs, a target number of residential consumers to
be served by the program, energy and emissions savings that will result from
the program, and a proposed timeline for the implementation of the program.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In fiscal year 2027, the sum of $15,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to Efficiency Vermont for the energy navigator program report.
(b) In fiscal year 2027, the sum of $150,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Climate Economy Action Center to collaborate with
Efficiency Vermont on the energy navigator program design; continue to
VT LEG #386174 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.610
2026 Page 4 of 4
develop its community-based energy navigator resources, programming, and
expertise; and support the expansion of its Energy Navigator Program to a
neighboring county.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386174 v.1